src/fst/morphology/affixes/noun-to-noun.lexc
+LLUINNAQ+Der/nn:%>girluinnaq tup- ;
+MINIQ+Der/nn:%>gimineq Z2+rZmorf ;
+MIU+Der/nn:%>gimiu tp ;
+MIUQ+Der/nn:%>gimioq tp ;
+MIUQ+Der/nn+PAK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn@U.Num.Pl@:%>gimiorpassuaq@U.Num.Pl@ Z2aqZ ;
+MIUQ+Der/nn+QATE+Der/nn:%>gimioqat tpt ;
+MIUQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>gimiorsuaq Z2aqZ ;
+MIUQ+Der/nn+TAQ+Der/nn:%>gimiortaq tp ;
+NGAJAK+Der/nn:%>gingajak tup- ;
+NGAJAK+Der/nn+VIK+Der/nn:%>gingajavik tup- ;
+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>ginnguaq Z1nnguaqZ ;
+NNGUAQ+Der/nn+INNAQ+Der/nn:%>ginnguaannaq tup- ;
+NNGUAQ+Der/nn+INNAQ+Der/nn:%>ginnguinnaq tup- ;
+NNGUAQ+Der/nn+KULUK+Der/nn:%>ginnguakkuluk tup- ;
+NNGUAQ+Der/nn+MIU+Der/nn:%>ginnguarmiu tp ;
+NNGUAQ+Der/nn+MIUQ+Der/nn:%>ginnguarmioq tp ;
+NNGUAQ+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn:%>ginnguassaq tp ;
+PAK@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nn+ALUK+Der/nn:%>girpaaluk@U.Num.Pl@ tup- ;
+PAK@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nn+ALUK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>girpaalussuaq@U.Num.Pl@ Z2aqZ ;
+PAK@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>girpassuaq@U.Num.Pl@ Z2aqZ ;
+PAK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn+LIK+Der/nn:%>girpassua Z2+lZ ;
+PALAAQ+Der/nn:%>gipalaaq tp ;
+PALAAQ+Der/nn+KUJUUQ+Der/nn:%>gipalaakujooq tp ;
+PALAAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>gipalaannguaq Z1nnguaqZ ;
+PALAAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>gipalaarsuaq Z2aqZ ;
+PALUK+Der/nn:%>gerpaluk Z2aqZ ;
+PALUK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>gerpalussuaq Z2aqZ ;
+PIAQ+Der/nn:%>gerpiaq tp ;
+PIAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>gerpiannguaq Z1nnguaqZ ;
+PILUK+Der/nn:%>gipiluk tup- ;
+PILUK+Der/nn+LIK+Der/nn:%>gipilu Z2+lZ ;
+PILUK+Der/nn+LIK+Der/nn+RUJUK+Der/nn:%>gipilulerujuk tup- ;
+PILUK+Der/nn+LIK+Der/nn+RUJUK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>gipilulerujussuaq Z2aqZ ;
+PILUK+Der/nn+LIK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>gipilulissuaq Z2aqZ ;
+PILUK+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn:%>gipilussaq tp ;
+PILUK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>gipilussuaq Z2aqZ ;
+QATE+Der/nn:%>geqat tpt ;
+QATE+Der/nn+GIIT+Der/nn:%>geqatigiit GIIT ;
+QQURTUUQ+Der/nn:%>geqqortooq tp ;
+QQURTUUQ+Der/nn+RUJUK+Der/nn:%>geqqortoorujuk tup- ;
+QQURTUUQ+Der/nn+RUJUK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>geqqortoorujussuaq Z2aqZ ;
+RALAAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>geralaannguaq Z1nnguaqZ ;
+RUJUK+Der/nn:%>gerujuk tup- ;
+RUJUK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>gerujussuaq Z2aqZ ;
+SIAQ+Der/nn:%>gisiaq tp ;
+SIAQ+Der/nn+INNAQ+Der/nn:%>gisiaannaq tup- ;
+SIAQ+Der/nn+INNAQ+Der/nn+MINIQ+Der/nn:%>gisiaannamineq Z2+rZmorf ;
+SIAQ+Der/nn+INNAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>gisiaannannguaq Z1nnguaqZ ;
+SIAQ+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn:%>gisiassaq tp ;
+SIAQ+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn+GALUAQ+Der/nn:%>gisiassaraluaq Z2aqZ ;
+SIAQ+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn+MINIQ+Der/nn:%>gisiassamineq Z2+rZmorf ;
+SIAQ+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn+SIAQ+Der/nn:%>gisiassarsiaq tp ;
+SIUT+Der/nn:%>gisiut tpt ;
+SIUT+Der/nn+LIK+Der/nn:%>gisiuti Z2+lZ ;
+SIUT+Der/nn+PAK@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>gisiuterpassuaq@U.Num.Pl@ Z2aqZ ;
+SIUT+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn:%>gisiutissaq tp ;
+SIUT+Der/nn+TAQ+Der/nn:%>gisiutitaq tp ; !Ondi 20240212
+SSAQ+Der/nn:%>gissaq tp ;
+SSAQ+Der/nn+GALUAQ+Der/nn:%>gissaraluaq Z2aqZ ;
+SSAQ+Der/nn+INNAQ+Der/nn:%>gissaannaq tup- ;
+SSAQ+Der/nn+LIK+Der/nn:%>gissa Z2+lZ ;
+SSAQ+Der/nn+ILIQI+Der/nv:%>gissaaleqi XIi_voqXmorf ;
+SSAQ+Der/nn+ISUA+Der/nv+Orth/Arch:%>gissaasua IV_voq ;
+SSAQ+Der/nn+LIUR+Der/nv:%>gissior IV_r_UTE_gennemgang ;
+SSAQ+Der/nn+MINIQ+Der/nn:%>gissamineq Z2+rZmorf ;
+SSAQ+Der/nn+PAK@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nn:%>gissarpak@U.Num.Pl@ tup- ;
+SSAQ+Der/nn+PAK@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>gissarpassuaq@U.Num.Pl@ Z2aqZ ;
+SSAQ+Der/nn+PAK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn+LIK+Der/nn:%>gissarpassua Z2+lZ ;
+SSAQ+Der/nn+RUJUK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>gissarujussuaq Z2aqZ ;
+SSAQ+Der/nn+SIAQ+Der/nn:%>gissarsiaq tp ;
+SSAQ+Der/nn+SIAQ+Der/nn+KKAAQ+Der/nn:%>gissarsiakkaaq tp ;
+SSAQ+Der/nn+SIAQ+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn:%>gissarsiassaq tp ;
+SSAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>gissarsuaq Z2aqZ ;
+SSAQ+Der/nn+TAQ+Der/nn:%>gissartaq tp ;
+SSAQ+Der/nn+TSIALAK+Der/nn:%>gissatsialak tup- ;
+SSAQ+Der/nn+TUAQ+Der/nn:%>gissatuaq tp ;
+SSAQ+Der/nn+TUAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>gissatuannguaq Z1nnguaqZ ;
+SSAQ+Der/nn+TAAQ+Der/nn:%>gissartaaq tp ;
+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>gersuaq Z2aqZ ;
+SUAQ+Der/nn+ARAQ+Der/nn:%>gersuaaraq Z1+qaZmorf ;
+SUAQ+Der/nn+ARAQ+Der/nn+KASIK+Der/nn:%>gersuaarakasik tup- ;
+SUAQ+Der/nn+KKUT+Der/nn:%>gersuakkut ZkkutZ ;
+SUAQ+Der/nn+LIAQ+Der/nn+RUJUK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>gersualiarujussuaq Z2aqZ ;
+SUAQ+Der/nn+MIU+Der/nn:%>gersuarmiu tp ;
+SUAQ+Der/nn+USAAQ+Der/nn:%>gersuaasaaq tp ;
+SUAQ+Der/nn+USAAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>gersuaarsaarsuaq Z2aqZ ;
+SUAQ+Der/nn+USAQ+Der/nn:%>gersuaasaq tp ;
+SUAQ+Der/nn+USAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>gersuaasarsuaq Z2aqZ ;
+SUAQ+Der/nn+UTE+Der/nn:%>gersuaat tpt ;
+SUAQ+Der/nn+VIK+Der/nn:%>gersuavik tup- ;
+SUNNI+Der/nn:%>gisunni tp ;
+SUNNI+Der/nn+ALAAQ+Der/nn:%>gisunnialaaq tp ;
+SUNNI+Der/nn+ALAAQ+Der/nn+INNAQ+Der/nn:%>gisunnialaaginnaq tup- ;
+SUNNI+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>gisunnersuaq Z2aqZ ;
+TAAQ+Der/nn:%>gitaaq tp ;
+TAAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>gitaarsuaq Z2aqZ ;
+TAQ+Der/nn:%>gitaq tp ;
+TAQ+Der/nn+GALUAQ+Der/nn:%>gitaraluaq   Z2aqZ ;
+TAQ+Der/nn+GASAAQ+Der/nn:%>gitarasaaq tp ;
+TAQ+Der/nn+LIK+Der/nn:%>gita Z2+lZ ;
+TAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>gitannguaq Z1nnguaqZ ;
+TAQ+Der/nn+PAK@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nn:%>gitarpak@U.Num.Pl@ tup- ;
+TAQ+Der/nn+PAK@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>gitarpassuaq@U.Num.Pl@ Z2aqZ ;
+TAQ+Der/nn+TUAQ+Der/nn:%>gitatuaq tp ;
+TSIALAK+Der/nn:%>gitsialak tup- ;
+TSIAQ+Der/nn:%>gitsiaq tup- ;
+TSIAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>gitsiannguaq Z1nnguaqZ ;
+TSIAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>gitsiarsuaq Z2aqZ ;
+TUAQ+Der/nn:%>gituaq tp ;
+TUAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>gituannguaq Z1nnguaqZ ;
+TUAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>gituarsuaq Z2aqZ ;
+TUGAQ+Der/nn:%>gertugaq Z1+kaZ ;
+TUQAQ+Der/nn:%>gitoqaq Z1+qaZ ;
+TUQAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>gitoqannguaq Z1nnguaqZ ;
+TUQAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>gitoqarsuaq Z2aqZ ;
+TUUQ+Der/nn:%>gitooq tp ;
+USAAQ+Der/nn:%>giasaaq tp ;
+USAQ+Der/nn:%>giusaq tp ;
+USAQ+Der/nn+ARAQ+Der/nn:%>giusaaraq Z1+qaZmorf ;
+USAQ+Der/nn+KASIK+Der/nn:%>giusakasik tup- ;
+USAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>giusannguaq Z1nnguaqZ ;
+UTE+Der/nn:%>giut tpt ;
+UTE+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>giutinnguaq Z1nnguaqZ ;
+UTE+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn:%>giutissaq tp ;
+UTE+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>giussuaq Z2aqZ ;
+UTE+Der/nn+TAAQ+Der/nn:%>giutitaaq tp ;
+UTE+Der/nn+TUQAQ+Der/nn:%>giutitoqaq Z1+qaZ ;
+UTE+Der/nn+TUQAQ+Der/nn+PALAAQ+Der/nn:%>giutitoqapalaaq tp ;
+UTE+Der/nn+TUQAQ+Der/nn+RUJUK+Der/nn:%>giutitoqarujuk tup- ;
+UTE+Der/nn+TUQAQ+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn:%>giutitoqassaq tp ;
+UTE+Der/nn+TUQAQ+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn+GALUAQ+Der/nn:%>giutitoqassaraluaq Z2aqZ ;
+UTE+Der/nn+TUQAQ+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn+INNAQ+Der/nn:%>giutitoqassaannaq tup- ;
+UTE+Der/nn+TUQAQ+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn+LIK+Der/nn:%>giutitoqassa Z2+lZ ;
+UTE+Der/nn+TUQAQ+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn+MINIQ+Der/nn:%>giutitoqassamineq Z2+rZmorf ;
+UTE+Der/nn+TUQAQ+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn+SIAQ+Der/nn:%>giutitoqassarsiaq tp ;
+UTE+Der/nn+TUQAQ+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn+SIAQ+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn:%>giutitoqassarsiassaq tp ;
+UTE+Der/nn+TUQAQ+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>giutitoqassarsuaq Z2aqZ ;
+UTE+Der/nn+TUQAQ+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn+TSIALAK+Der/nn:%>giutitoqassatsialak tup- ;
+UTE+Der/nn+TUQAQ+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn+TUAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>giutitoqassatuannguaq Z1nnguaqZ ;
+UTE+Der/nn+TUQAQ+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn+TUAQ+Der/nn:%>giutitoqassatuaq tp ;
+UTE+Der/nn+TUQAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>giutitoqarsuaq Z2aqZ ;
+UTE+Der/nn+TUQAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn+PALAAQ+Der/nn:%>giutitoqarsuapalaaq tp ;
+UTE+Der/nn+TUQAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn:%>giutitoqarsuassaq tp ;
+VVAARIK+Der/nn:%>giffaarik tup- ;
+VIK+Der/nn:%>givik tup- ;
+VIK+Der/nn+SIAQ+Der/nn+LIK+Der/nn:%>givissia Z2+lZ ; ! 'qitornavissialik'
+VIK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>givissuaq Z2aqZ ;
